Utah statutes.
9-6-703.   State-Owned Art Collections Inventory Study Program -- Division duties -- Funding for the study program.

(1)  There is established the State-Owned Art Collections Inventory Study Program to study:

(a)  providing a comprehensive electronic inventory of all state owned or held works of art, including each work of art's title, artist, medium, location, history, owner, condition, and one or more electronic images of each work of art;

(b)  providing a publicly accessible and searchable Internet site of the electronic image of each work of art and other selected information in the inventory; and

(c)  providing for the maintenance and tracking of the inventory, including the perpetual updating and improving of the inventory and its public accessibility.

(2)  The division shall study, design, and plan a program in accordance with this part with the advice and assistance of the committee.

(3)  The division shall study contracting with public and private entities as needed to implement the provisions of the program on a cost effective basis.

(4)  The study program shall be funded from money:

(a)  appropriated by the Legislature;

(b)  private donations to the program; and

(c)  other sources that may be made available to the program.

(5)  The division, with the advice and assistance of the committee, shall establish a plan including the inventory scope,  phases, and a budget for the implementation.



Enacted by Chapter 229, 2006 General Session

